Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 211B.13, is amended to read: 211B.13 BRIBERY, TREATING, AND SOLICITATION. Subdivision 1. Bribery, advancing money, and treating prohibited. new text begin (a) new text end A person deleted text begin whodeleted text end new text begin is guilty of a felony if the personnew text end willfully, directly or indirectly, advances, pays, gives, promises, new text begin provides a chance to win, new text end or lends any money, food, liquor, clothing, entertainment, or other thing of monetary value, or who offers, promises, or endeavors to obtain any money, position, appointment, employment, or other valuable consideration, to or for a person, in order to inducenew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end a voter to refrain from voting, or to vote in a particular way, at an electiondeleted text begin , is guilty of a felonydeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) an individual to register to vote; or new text end new text begin (3) a registered or eligible voter to sign a petition that is directly related to an election during the period beginning on the first day of the absentee voting period for that election and ending on election daynew text end . new text begin (b)new text end This section does not prevent a candidate from stating publicly preference for or support of another candidate to be voted for at the same primary or election. Refreshments of food or nonalcoholic beverages having a value up to $5 consumed on the premises at a private gathering or public meeting are not prohibited under this section. Subd. 2. Certain solicitations prohibited. A person may not knowingly solicit, receive, or accept any money, property, or other thing of monetary value, or a promise deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end pledgenew text begin , or opportunity to win anynew text end of these that is a disbursement prohibited by this section or section 211B.15. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Civil enforcement. new text end new text begin In addition to other remedies, the attorney general or county attorney may enforce this section pursuant to section 8.31. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end